Utah statutes.
17-28-2.6.   Merit principles.

The County Fire Civil Service System shall be established and administered in a manner that will provide for the effective implementation of the following merit principles:

(1)  recruiting, selecting, and advancing employees on the basis of their relative ability, knowledge, and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for initial appointment;

(2)  provision of equitable and adequate job classification and compensation systems, including pay and benefits programs;

(3)  training of employees as needed to assure high-quality performance;

(4)  retention of employees on the basis of the adequacy of their performance and separation of employees whose inadequate performance cannot be corrected;

(5)  fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of personal administration without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, political affiliation, age, or disability, and with proper regard for their privacy and constitutional rights as citizens;

(6)  provision of information to employees regarding their political rights and prohibited practices under the Hatch Act; and

(7)  provision of a formal procedure for processing the appeals and grievances of employees without discrimination, coercion, restraint, or reprisal.



Amended by Chapter 73, 2001 General Session

